Utah statutes.
26-8b-201.   Authority to administer CPR or use an AED.
(1)  A person may administer CPR on another person without a license,
certificate, or other governmental authorization if the person reasonably
believes that the other person is in sudden cardiac arrest.
(2)  A person may use an AED on another person without a license, certificate,
or other governmental authorization if the person reasonably believes that the
other person is in sudden cardiac arrest.
